New York, session 2025-2026, A9000.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The public health law is amended by adding a new section 2 267-c to read as follows: 3 § 267-c. Information concerning perimenopause and menopause. 1. The 4 department shall develop an informational pamphlet concerning perimeno- 5 pause and menopause. Such pamphlet shall include, but shall not be 6 limited to, evidence-based information concerning: 7 (a) the stages of perimenopause and menopause; 8 (b) the signs and symptoms of perimenopause and menopause; and 9 (c) options for the management and treatment of perimenopause and 10 menopause. 11 2. Such informational pamphlet shall be written in layperson's 12 language and shall be made available in English and the six most common 13 non-English languages spoken by individuals with limited English profi- 14 ciency in New York state as based on the most recent census. 15 3. Such informational pamphlet shall be made available on the depart- 16 ment's website as a printable file and may also be made available for 17 order as a printed deliverable on the department's website. 18 4. Practitioners shall make such informational pamphlet available to 19 patients. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD13500-03-6 A. 9000--A 2 1 5. For purposes of this section, "practitioner" shall mean a health 2 care professional licensed, certified or otherwise authorized to prac- 3 tice under the education law, acting within their scope of practice. 4 § 2. This act shall take effect on the ninetieth day after it shall 5 have become a law.